Hawaii statutes.
§226-57 Functional plans; implementation.
(a) Functional plans shall be used to guide the allocation of resources for
the implementation of state policies adopted by the legislature.

(b) The legislature, upon a finding of
overriding statewide concern, may determine in any given instance that the site
for a specific project may be other than that designated in the county general
plan; provided that any proposed facility or project contained in a county
general plan shall not require the actual development or implementation of that
facility or project or its inclusion in any state functional plan by any state
agency. The implementation of functional plans shall conform to existing laws,
rules, standards, and this chapter. [L 1978, c 100, pt of §2; am L 1984, c 236,
§10; am L 1987, c 336, §4(9); am and ren L 1991, c 76, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next